Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 3. Additional Powers.

Cross references. —

For municipal powers to control dogs, see AS

03.55.010

—

03.55.070

.

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 167 et seq.

64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Utilities, §§ 15 — 18, 73 — 76, 150.

Liability of municipalities for pollution of subterranean waters. 38 ALR2d 1305.

Validity and construction of anti-water pollution statutes or ordinances. 32 ALR3d 215.

Sec. 29.35.200.
First class borough powers.

A first class borough may exercise by ordinance on a nonareawide basis any power not otherwise prohibited by law.

A first class borough may by ordinance exercise the following powers on an areawide basis:

provide transportation systems;

provide water pollution control;

provide air pollution control in accordance with AS

46.14.400

;

license day care facilities;

license, impound, and dispose of animals;

establish an energy improvement assessment program under AS

29.55.100

—

29.55.165

.

In addition to powers conferred by (b) of this section, a first class borough may, on an areawide basis, exercise a power not otherwise prohibited by law if the power has been acquired in accordance with AS

29.35.300

.

A first class borough that exercises power necessary to contain, clean up, or prevent a release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance, and exercises a power granted to a municipality under AS 46.04, AS 46.08, or AS 46.09 shall exercise its authority in a manner that is consistent with a regional master plan prepared by the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS

46.04.210

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 83 SLA 1991; am § 7 ch 74 SLA 1993; am § 2 ch 25 SLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, in subsection (d), “and exercises” was substituted for “and exercise” to correct a manifest error in ch. 83, SLA 1991.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective September 8, 2017, added (b)(6), and made a related change.

Sec. 29.35.210.
Second class borough powers.

A second class borough may by ordinance exercise the following powers on a nonareawide basis:

provide transportation systems;

regulate the offering for sale, exposure for sale, sale, use, or explosion of fireworks;

license, impound, and dispose of animals;

subject to AS

29.35.050

, provide garbage, solid waste, and septic waste collection and disposal;

provide air pollution control under AS

46.14.400

;

provide water pollution control;

participate in federal or state loan programs for housing rehabilitation and improvement for energy conservation;

provide for economic development;

provide for the acquisition and construction of local service roads and trails under AS

19.30.111

—

19.30.251

;

establish an emergency services communications center under AS

29.35.130

;

subject to AS

28.01.010

, regulate the licensing and operation of motor vehicles and operators;

engage in activities authorized under AS

29.47.460

;

contain, clean up, or prevent a release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance, and exercise a power granted to a municipality under AS 46.04, AS 46.08, or AS 46.09; the borough shall exercise its authority under this paragraph in a manner that is consistent with a regional master plan prepared by the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS

46.04.210

;

establish an energy improvement assessment program under AS

29.55.100

—

29.55.165

.

A second class borough may by ordinance exercise the following powers on an areawide basis:

provide transportation systems;

license, impound, and dispose of animals;

provide air pollution control under AS

46.14.400

;

provide water pollution control;

license day care facilities;

establish an energy improvement assessment program under AS

29.55.100

—

29.55.165

.

In addition to powers conferred by (a) of this section, a second class borough may, on a nonareawide basis, exercise a power not otherwise prohibited by law if the exercise of the power has been approved at an election by a majority of voters living in the borough but outside all cities in the borough.

In addition to powers conferred by (b) of this section, a second class borough may, on an areawide basis, exercise a power not otherwise prohibited by law if the power has been acquired in accordance with AS

29.35.300

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 118 SLA 1988; am § 39 ch 21 SLA 1991; am § 5 ch 83 SLA 1991; am §§ 8, 9 ch 74 SLA 1993; am §§ 3, 4 ch 25 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective September 8, 2017, added (a)(14) and (b)(6), and made related changes.

Sec. 29.35.220.
Third class borough powers.

A third class borough may borrow money and issue negotiable or nonnegotiable bonds or other evidences of indebtedness as provided by AS 29.47.

Areawide exercise of a power by a third class borough other than education and tax assessment and collection is not authorized.

A third class borough may acquire the power to provide for planning, platting, and land use regulation as provided in AS 29.40 for first and second class boroughs, except the power may only be exercised within a service area.

A third class borough may acquire any power not otherwise prohibited by law, except the power may only be exercised within a service area.

A third class borough may by ordinance exercise power necessary to contain, clean up, or prevent a release or threatened release of oil or a hazardous substance, and exercise a power granted to a municipality under AS 46.04, AS 46.08, or AS 46.09, but the power authorized by this subsection may be exercised only on a nonareawide basis. The borough shall exercise its authority under this subsection in a manner that is consistent with a regional master plan prepared by the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS

46.04.210

.

History.

(§ 10 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 83 SLA 1991)